Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB703.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 505.2(a) of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 505.2. Limited Wineries.--(a) In the interest of promoting tourism and recreational development in Pennsylvania, holders of a limited winery license may:123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 * * *(7) At the discretion of the board, obtain a farm winery distillers permit. The permit shall entitle the holder to distill brandy for the purposes of fortifying wine. A permit holder may only use grapes and other fruits grown on the holder's premises for the production of brandy. The holder may not sell or transfer the distilled brandy to any individual or business within this Commonwealth. A farm winery distillers permit shall be issued upon proper application and payment of an annual fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250). Except as provided in this clause, limited wineries utilizing farm winery distillers permits shall be governed by all applicable provisions of this act as well as by all applicable regulations promulgated by the board.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0703PN0720 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516